Hawaii statutes.
[§329-17] Schedule III tests. A
substance shall be placed in schedule III if the substance has a degree of
danger or probable danger less than the substances listed in schedules I and II
according to the determination made pursuant to section 329-11. [L 1972, c 10,
pt of §1]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next